Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB214.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1102-C.3 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 1102-C.3. Excluded Transactions.--The tax imposed by section 1102-C shall not be imposed upon:* * *(26) A transfer of real estate to a first-time home buyer. For a transfer under this clause in which more than one 12345678910111213141516171819202122 individual is recorded on the deed of real estate at the time of transfer, each individual must be a first-time home buyer to qualify for the exclusion provided by this clause. For the purposes of this clause, the term "first-time home buyer" shall mean an individual who:(i) resides, or will reside upon transfer under this clause, in this Commonwealth;(ii) is or will be domiciled in a single-family residence transferred under this clause; and(iii) has not owned or purchased, directly or through a trust, limited liability company, partnership or other legal entity, either individually or jointly, a single-family residence prior to the transfer, including a manufactured home, trailer, mobile home or unit in a condominium, cooperative or planned community , in this Commonwealth or any other state . Section 2. Section 1101-D of the act is amended to read:Section 1101-D. Imposition.--(a) The duly constituted authorities of the following political subdivisions--cities of the second class, cities of the second class A, cities of the third class, boroughs, incorporated towns, townships of the first class, townships of the second class, school districts of the first class A, school districts of the second class, school districts of the third class and school districts of the fourth class, in all cases including independent school districts--may, in their discretion, by ordinance or resolution, for general revenue purposes, levy, assess and collect or provide for the levying, assessment and collection of a tax upon a transfer of real property or an interest in real property within the limits of the political subdivision, regardless of where the instruments making the transfers are made, executed or delivered 20250HB0214PN0171 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or where the actual settlements on the transfer take place, to the extent that the transactions are subject to the tax imposed by Article XI-C. A tax imposed under this article shall be subject to rate limitations provided by section 5, section 8 and section 17 of the act of December 31, 1965 (P.L.1257, No.511), known as "The Local Tax Enabling Act."(b) The exclusion provided under section 1102-C.3(26) shall not apply to a tax imposed under this article.Section 3. The addition of section 1102-C.3(26) of the act shall apply to real estate transfers made on or after the effective date of this section.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0214PN0171 - 3 - 123456789101112